Colorado, session 2026A, HB1041.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-6-109, amend (1),
(3)(a), and (3)(b)(IV); and repeal (2) as follows:
42-6-109. Sale or transfer of vehicle - program.
(1) Except as provided in section 42-6-113, a person shall not sell
or otherwise transfer a motor or off-highway vehicle to a purchaser or
transferee without delivering to the purchaser or transferee a certificate of
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

title to the vehicle duly transferred in the manner prescribed in section
42-6-110. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the THE
certificate of title may be in an electronic format. Except as provided in
section 42-6-115, a purchaser or transferee does not acquire any right, title,
or interest in and to a motor or off-highway vehicle purchased by the
purchaser or transferee unless and until he or she THE PURCHASER OR
TRANSFEREE obtains from the transferor the certificate of title duly
transferred in accordance with this part 1. A lienholder ANY PARTY TO THE
TRANSACTION may request either a paper or electronic version of a
certificate of title.
(2) Except as provided in section 42-6-115, a paper copy of a
certificate of title is necessary for a transaction in which:
(a) Either party to the transaction is located outside Colorado; or
(b) The purchaser pays for a motor or off-highway vehicle entirely
with cash.
(3) (a) Beginning January 1, 2019, the department shall implement
a voluntary program for an owner of a motor vehicle to notify the
department or an authorized agent after ownership of the motor vehicle is
transferred to another person in accordance with subsections (1) and (2)
SUBSECTION (1) of this section.
(b) A report of ownership transfer is properly filed if the report is
made in a manner, which may include by electronic means, approved by the
department and received by the department or authorized agent within five
business days after the transfer of ownership, and includes the following:
(IV) An affidavit, signed under penalty of perjury, that the
requirements for the transfer of ownership in subsections (1) and (2)
SUBSECTION (1) of this section have been satisfied.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1041

such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1041